Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2133
Supplier of electrical energy; liability limited; exception.

Upon inspection and approval by any certified inspector, all liability upon any supplier of electrical service for subsequent damage or loss arising from any installation shall be terminated, except for any acts of gross negligence by such supplier.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 33;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-5,103.